Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RETROFITTING GLASS ON U.S. BANK STADIUM FOR BIRD SAFETY; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget for a grant to the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority to retrofit U.S. Bank Stadium glass with exterior visual markers to make the glass bird safe. The Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority must treat four glass areas as recommended in the 2019 U.S. Bank Stadium Bird Collision Study Final Report, using one or more approved retrofit products specified in the report, after consulting with the American Bird Conservancy's Glass Collisions Program staff. Retrofitting must be completed by June 30, 2026. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end